Idaho, session 2025, H0279.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. (1) It is the intent of the Legislature
for the State of Idaho to move toward an education funding model that dis-
tributes funds on a per-student basis that is calculated based on the num-
ber of students currently attending each school. Although the provisions of
this act do not complete this goal, this act is intended to be a first step in
shifting the model for education funding in this direction.
(2) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the per-student
funding model should be refined to encompass a weighted per-student fund-
ing formula that allocates education funding to school districts and public
charter schools using a base amount per student and an additional amount for
certain weighted student characteristics.
(3) It is further the intent of the Legislature to revise the education
funding payment schedule to schools.

SECTION 2. That Section 33-1001, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1001. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Administrative schools" means and applies to all elementary
schools and kindergartens within a district that are situated ten (10) miles
or less from both the other elementary schools and the principal administra-
tive office of the district and all secondary schools within a district that


are situated fifteen (15) miles or less from other secondary schools of the
district.
(2) "Administrative staff" means those who hold an administrator cer-
tificate and are employed as a superintendent, an elementary or secondary
school principal, or are assigned administrative duties over and above those
commonly assigned to teachers.
(3) "At-risk student" means a student in grades 6 through 12 who:
(a) Meets at least three (3) of the following criteria:
(i) Has repeated at least one (1) grade;
(ii) Has absenteeism greater than ten percent (10%) during the
preceding semester;
(iii) Has an overall grade point average less than 1.5 on a 4.0
scale prior to enrolling in an alternative secondary program;
(iv) Has failed one (1) or more academic subjects in the past year;
(v) Is below proficient, based on local criteria, standardized
tests, or both;
(vi) Is two (2) or more credits per year behind the rate required
to graduate or for grade promotion; or
(vii) Has attended three (3) or more schools within the previous
two (2) years, not including dual enrollment; or
(b) Meets any of the following criteria:
(i) Has documented substance abuse or a pattern of substance
abuse;
(ii) Is pregnant or a parent;
(iii) Is an emancipated youth or unaccompanied youth;
(iv) Is a previous dropout;
(v) Has a serious personal, emotional, or medical issue or is-
sues;
(vi) Has a court or agency referral; or
(vii) Demonstrates behavior detrimental to the student's academic
progress.
(4) "Average daily attendance" or "pupils in average daily attendance"
means the aggregate number of days enrolled students are present, divided by
the number of days of school in the reporting period; provided, however, that
students for whom no Idaho school district is a home district shall not be
considered in such computation.
(5) "Career ladder" means the compensation table used for determining
the allocations districts receive for instructional staff and pupil service
staff based on specific performance criteria and is made up of a residency
compensation rung and a professional compensation rung.
(6) "Child with a disability" means a child evaluated as having an
intellectual disability, a hearing loss including deafness, a speech or
language impairment, a visual impairment including blindness, an emo-
tional behavioral disorder, an orthopedic impairment, autism, a traumatic
brain injury, another health impairment, a specific learning disability,
deaf-blindness, or multiple disabilities and who, by reason thereof, needs
special education and related services.
(7) "Compensation rung" means the rung on the career ladder that corre-
sponds with the compensation level performance criteria.
(8) "Economically disadvantaged student" means a student who:


(a) Is eligible for a free or reduced-price lunch under the Richard B.
Russell national school lunch act, 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq., excluding
students who are eligible only through a school's community eligibility
program;
(b) Resides with a family receiving assistance under the program of
block grants to states for temporary assistance for needy families
(TANF) established under part A of title IV of the social security act,
42 U.S.C. 601 et seq.;
(c) Is eligible to receive medical assistance under the medicaid pro-
gram under title XIX of the social security act, 42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq.;
or
(d) Is considered homeless for purposes of the federal McKinney-Vento
homeless assistance act, 42 U.S.C. 11301 et seq.
(9) "Elementary grades" or "elementary average daily attendance" means
and applies to students enrolled in grades 1 through 6, inclusive, or any
combination thereof.
(10) "Elementary schools" are schools that serve grades 1 through 6, in-
clusive, or any combination thereof.
(11) "Elementary/secondary schools" are schools that serve grades 1
through 12, inclusive, or any combination thereof.
(12) "English language learner" or "ELL" means a student who does not
score proficient on the English language development assessment established
by rule of the state board of education.
(13) "Gifted and talented" shall have the same meaning as provided in
section 33-2001(4), Idaho Code.
(14) "Homebound student" means any student who would normally and regu-
larly attend school but is confined to home or hospital because of an illness
or accident for a period of ten (10) or more consecutive days.
(15) "Instructional staff" means those who hold an Idaho certificate
issued under section 33-1201, Idaho Code, and who are either involved in the
direct instruction of a student or group of students or who serve in a mentor
or teacher leader position for individuals who hold an Idaho certificate
issued under section 33-1201, Idaho Code.
(16) "Kindergarten" or "kindergarten average daily attendance" means
and applies to all students enrolled in a school year, less than a school
year, or summer kindergarten program.
(17) "Local salary schedule" means a compensation table adopted by a
school district or public charter school, which table is used for determin-
ing moneys to be distributed for instructional staff and pupil service staff
salaries. Minimum compensation provided under a local salary schedule shall
be at least equal to the minimum amounts established pursuant to section
33-1004E, Idaho Code.
(18) "Measurable student achievement" means the measurement of student
academic achievement or growth within a given interval of instruction for
those students who have been enrolled in and attended eighty percent (80%)
of the interval of instruction. Measures and targets shall be chosen at the
school level in collaboration with the staff member impacted by the measures
and applicable district staff and approved by the school board. Measures and
targets must also align with the performance measures and benchmarks in the
continuous improvement plan described in section 33-320, Idaho Code. The


most effective measures and targets are those generated as close to the ac-
tual work as possible. Targets may be based on grade- or department-level
achievement or growth goals that create collaboration within groups. In-
dividual measurable student achievement targets and the percentage of stu-
dents meeting individual targets must be reported annually to the state. As-
sessment tools that may be used for measuring student achievement and growth
include:
(a) Idaho standards achievement test (ISAT), including interim ISAT
assessments;
(b) Student learning objectives;
(c) Teacher-constructed assessments of student growth;
(d) Pre- and post-tests, including district-adopted tests;
(e) Performance-based assessments;
(f) Idaho reading indicator, which will be one (1) of the required as-
sessment tools for applicable staff;
(g) College entrance exams or preliminary college entrance exams such
as PSAT, SAT, PACT, and ACT;
(h) Advanced placement exams;
(i) Career technical exams;
(j) Number of business or industry certificates or credentials earned
by students in an approved career technical education program;
(k) Number of students completing career technical education capstone
courses; and
(l) Number of students enrolled in career technical education courses
that are part of a program that culminates with business or industry
certificates or credentials.
(19) "Per-student funding" means allocating education funding to
school districts and public charter schools using a base amount per student.
For each school district or public charter school, the formula shall be based
on the average daily attendance counts for verified students reported pur-
suant to section 33-1003A, Idaho Code.
(19) (20) "Performance criteria" means the standards specified for
instructional staff and pupil service staff to demonstrate teaching pro-
ficiency for a given compensation rung. Each element of the professional
compensation rung and advanced professional compensation rung performance
criteria, as identified in this section and as applicable to a staff member's
position, shall be documented, reported, and subject to review for determin-
ing movement on the career ladder.
(20) (21)(a) "Professional compensation rung performance criteria"
means:
(i) An overall rating of proficient or higher, and no components
rated as unsatisfactory, on the state framework for teaching eval-
uation or equivalent for pupil service staff or principal or other
school level administrator evaluation aligned to the state frame-
work for teaching evaluation; and
(ii) Demonstrating the majority of students have met measurable
student achievement targets or student success indicator targets.
(b) "Advanced professional compensation rung performance criteria"
means:


(i) An overall rating of proficient or higher, no components
rated as unsatisfactory or basic, and rated as distinguished
overall in domain two -- classroom environment or domain three
-- instruction and use of assessment on the state framework for
teaching evaluation or equivalent for pupil service staff or prin-
cipal or other school level administrator evaluation aligned to
the state framework for teaching evaluation; and
(ii) Demonstrating seventy-five percent (75%) or more of their
students have met their measurable student achievement targets or
student success indicator targets.
(21) (22) "Public school district" or "school district" or "district"
means any public school district organized under the laws of this state, in-
cluding specially chartered school districts.
(22) (23) "Pupil service staff" means those who provide services to stu-
dents, but are not involved in direct instruction of those students, and hold
a pupil personnel services certificate.
(23) (24) "School board" means a school district board of trustees or
the board of directors of a public charter school.
(24) (25) "Secondary grades" or "secondary average daily attendance"
means and applies to students enrolled in grades 7 through 12, inclusive, or
any combination thereof.
(25) (26) "Secondary schools" are schools that serve grades 7 through
12, inclusive, or any combination thereof.
(26) (27) "Separate elementary school" means an elementary school lo-
cated more than ten (10) miles on an all-weather road from both the near-
est elementary school and elementary/secondary school serving like grades
within the same school district and from the location of the office of the su-
perintendent of schools of such district, or from the office of the chief ad-
ministrative officer of such district if the district employs no superinten-
dent of schools.
(27) (28) "Separate kindergarten" means a kindergarten located more
than ten (10) miles on an all-weather road from both the nearest kindergarten
school within the same school district and from the location of the office
of the superintendent of schools of such district, or from the office of the
chief administrative officer of such district if the district employs no
superintendent of schools.
(28) (29) "Separate secondary school" means any secondary school lo-
cated more than fifteen (15) miles on an all-weather road from any other
secondary school and elementary/secondary school serving like grades oper-
ated by the district.
(29) (30) "Special education" means specially designed instruction or
speech/language therapy at no cost to the parent to meet the unique needs of a
student who is a child with a disability, including instruction in the class-
room, the home, hospitals, institutions, and other settings; instruction
in physical education; speech therapy and language therapy; transition ser-
vices; travel training; assistive technology services; and vocational edu-
cation.
(30) (31) "Student learning plan" means a plan that outlines a student's
program of study, which should include a rigorous academic core and a related


sequence of electives in academics, career technical education, or humani-
ties aligned with the student's post-graduation goals.
(31) (32) "Student success indicators" means measurable indicators of
student achievement or growth, other than academic, within a predefined in-
terval of time for a specified group of students. Measures and targets shall
be chosen at the district or school level in collaboration with the pupil
service staff member impacted by the measures and applicable district staff.
Individual measurable student achievement targets and the percentage of
students meeting each target must be reported annually to the state. Student
success indicators include:
(a) Quantifiable goals stated in a student's 504 plan or individualized
education plan.
(b) Quantifiable goals stated in a student's behavior improvement
plan.
(c) School- or district-identified measurable student objectives for a
specified student group or population.
(d) The percentage of students who create student learning plans in
grade 8 or who annually update their student learning plans thereafter.
(e) The percentage of students who satisfactorily complete one (1) or
more advanced opportunities options as identified in section 33-4602,
Idaho Code, or who earn business or industry certificates or creden-
tials. This indicator shall be one (1) of the required indicators for
applicable staff.
(32) (33) "Support program" means the educational support program as
described in section 33-1002, Idaho Code, the transportation support pro-
gram described in section 33-1006, Idaho Code, and the exceptional education
support program as described in section 33-1007, Idaho Code.
(33) (34) "Support unit" means a function of average daily attendance
used in the calculations to determine financial support provided to the pub-
lic school districts.
(34) (35) "Teacher" means any person employed in a teaching, instruc-
tional, supervisory, educational administrative or educational and scien-
tific capacity in any school district. In case of doubt, the state board of
education shall determine whether any person employed requires certifica-
tion as a teacher.
SECTION 3. That Section 33-1002, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1002. EDUCATIONAL SUPPORT PROGRAM. The educational support pro-
gram is calculated as follows:
(1) State Educational Support Funds. Add the state appropriation, in-
cluding the moneys available in the public school income fund, together with
all miscellaneous revenues to determine the total state funds.
(2) From the total state funds subtract the following amounts needed
for state support of special programs provided by a school district:
(a) Pupil tuition-equivalency allowances as provided in section
33-1002B, Idaho Code;
(b) Transportation support program as provided in section 33-1006,
Idaho Code;


(c) Feasibility studies allowance as provided in section 33-1007A,
Idaho Code;
(d) The approved costs for border district allowance, provided in sec-
tion 33-1403, Idaho Code, as determined by the state superintendent of
public instruction;
(e) The approved costs for exceptional child approved contract al-
lowance, provided in subsection 2. of section 33-2004, Idaho Code, as
determined by the state superintendent of public instruction;
(f) Salary-based apportionment calculated as provided in sections
33-1004 through 33-1004F, Idaho Code;
(g) Unemployment insurance benefit payments according to the provi-
sions of section 72-1349A, Idaho Code;
(h) For expenditure as provided by the public school technology pro-
gram;
(i) For employee severance payments as provided in section 33-521,
Idaho Code;
(j) For distributions to the Idaho digital learning academy as provided
in section 33-1020, Idaho Code;
(k) For charter school facilities funds and reimbursements paid pur-
suant to section 33-5207, Idaho Code;
(l) For an online course portal as provided for in section 33-1024,
Idaho Code;
(m) For advanced opportunities as provided for in chapter 46, title 33,
Idaho Code;
(n) For additional math and science courses for high school students as
provided in section 33-1021, Idaho Code;
(o) For master teacher premiums as provided in section 33-1004I, Idaho
Code;
(p) For the support of provisions that provide a safe environment con-
ducive to student learning and maintain classroom discipline, an allo-
cation of three hundred dollars ($300) per support unit;
(q) An amount specified in the appropriation bill for the public
schools educational support program for counseling support as provided
for in section 33-1212A, Idaho Code, shall be distributed for grades 8
through 12 as follows:
(i) For school districts and public charter schools with one hun-
dred (100) or more students enrolled in grades 8 through 12, a pro
rata distribution based on students enrolled in grades 8 through
12 or eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000), whichever is greater;
(ii) For school districts and public charter schools with fewer
than one hundred (100) students enrolled in grades 8 through 12,
one hundred eighty dollars ($180) per student enrolled in grades
8 through 12 or nine thousand dollars ($9,000), whichever is
greater;
(r) An amount specified in the public schools educational support pro-
gram appropriation bill for literacy intervention. The disbursements
made to the school districts and public charter schools shall be calcu-
lated as follows:


(i) Fifty percent (50%) based on average full-time equivalent
enrollment of students in kindergarten through grade 3 as of the
first Friday in November;
(ii) Fifty percent (50%) based on the number of kindergarten
through grade 3 students who move a full level or who are profi-
cient from the spring-to-spring administration of the statewide
reading assessment in the prior fiscal year or, if there is not a
prior spring assessment for the student, from fall to spring; and
(iii) Funds will be distributed to the school district or pub-
lic charter school where the student is enrolled and takes the
statewide reading assessment. Any school district or public char-
ter school that has greater than one (1) but fewer than five (5)
students in kindergarten through grade 3 will receive a minimum of
two thousand dollars ($2,000). Economically disadvantaged stu-
dents shall count as one and three quarters (1.75) students for the
purpose of calculating the distribution of the funds in subpara-
graph (ii) of this paragraph.
(s) For mastery-based education as provided for in section 33-1632,
Idaho Code;
(t) For pay for success contracting as provided in section 33-125B,
Idaho Code; and
(u) Any additional amounts as required by statute to effect administra-
tive adjustments or as specifically required by the provisions of any
bill of appropriation;
to secure the total educational support distribution funds.
(3) Average Daily Attendance. The total state average daily attendance
shall be the sum of the average daily attendance of all of the school dis-
tricts of the state. The state board of education shall establish rules set-
ting forth the procedure to determine average daily attendance and the time
for, and method of, submission of such report. Average daily attendance cal-
culation shall be carried out to the nearest hundredth. Computation of av-
erage daily attendance shall also be governed by the provisions of section
33-1003A, Idaho Code.
(4) Support Units. The total state support units shall be determined
by using the tables set out hereafter called computation of kindergarten
support units, computation of elementary support units, computation of sec-
ondary support units, computation of exceptional education support units,
and computation of alternative school support units. The sum of all of the
total support units of all school districts of the state shall be the total
state support units.
COMPUTATION OF KINDERGARTEN SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily
Attendance Attendance Divisor Units Allowed
41 or more.... 40...................... 1 or more as computed
31 - 40.99 ADA.... -....................... 1
26 - 30.99 ADA.... -....................... .85
21 - 25.99 ADA.... -....................... .75


16 - 20.99 ADA.... -....................... .6
8 - 15.99 ADA.... -....................... .5
1 - 7.99 ADA.... -....................... count as elementary
COMPUTATION OF ELEMENTARY SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily Minimum Units
Attendance Attendance Divisor Allowed
300 or more ADA....... ............................... .. 15
..23...grades 4,5 & 6....
..22...grades 1,2 & 3....1994-95
..21...grades 1,2 & 3....1995-96
..20...grades 1,2 & 3....1996-97
and each year thereafter.
160 to 299.99 ADA... 20................................ 8.4
110 to 159.99 ADA... 19................................ 6.8
71.1 to 109.99 ADA... 16................................ 4.7
51.7 to 71.0 ADA... 15................................ 4.0
33.6 to 51.6 ADA... 13................................ 2.8
16.6 to 33.5 ADA... 12................................ 1.4
1.0 to 16.5 ADA... n/a............................... 1.0
COMPUTATION OF SECONDARY SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily Minimum Units
Attendance Attendance Divisor Allowed
750 or more.... 18.5..............................47
400 - 749.99 ADA.... 16................................28
300 - 399.99 ADA.... 14.5..............................22
200 - 299.99 ADA.... 13.5..............................17
100 - 199.99 ADA.... 12................................9
99.99 or fewer Units allowed as follows:
Grades 7 - 12 ..................................8
Grades 9 - 12 ..................................6
Grades 7 - 9 ..................................1 per 14 ADA
Grades 7 - 8 ..................................1 per 16 ADA
COMPUTATION OF EXCEPTIONAL EDUCATION SUPPORT UNITS
Average Daily Minimum Units
Attendance Attendance Divisor Allowed
14 or more.... 14.5..............................1 or more as
computed


12 - 13.99.... -.................................1
8 - 11.99.... -..................................75
4 - 7.99.... -..................................5
1 - 3.99.... -..................................25
COMPUTATION OF ALTERNATIVE SCHOOL SUPPORT UNITS
(Computation of alternative school support units shall include
grades 6 through 12)
Pupils in Attendance Attendance Divisor Minimum Units
Allowed
12 or more.......... 12................................ 1 or more as
computed
In applying these tables to any given separate attendance unit, no
school district shall receive less total money than it would receive if it
had a lesser average daily attendance in such separate attendance unit. In
applying the kindergarten table to a kindergarten program of fewer days
than a full school year, the support unit allowance shall be in ratio to the
number of days of a full school year. The attendance of students attending
an alternative school in a school district reporting fewer than one hundred
(100) secondary students in average daily attendance shall not be assigned
to the alternative table if the student is from a school district reporting
fewer than one hundred (100) secondary students in average daily attendance,
but shall instead be assigned to the secondary table of the school district
in which they are attending the alternative school, unless the alternative
school in question serves students from multiple districts reporting fewer
than one hundred (100) secondary students in average daily attendance. The
tables for exceptional education and alternative school support units shall
be applicable only for programs approved by the state department of educa-
tion following rules established by the state board of education. Moneys
generated from computation of support units for alternative schools shall be
utilized for alternative school programs. School district administrative
and facility costs may be included as part of the alternative school expen-
ditures.
(5) State Distribution Factor per Support Unit. Divide educational
support program distribution funds, after subtracting the amounts necessary
to pay the obligations specified in subsection (2) of this section, by the
total state support units to secure the state distribution factor per sup-
port unit.
(6) (5) District Support Units. The number of support units for each
school district in the state shall be determined as follows:
(a)(i) Divide the actual average daily attendance, excluding stu-
dents approved for inclusion in the exceptional child educational
program for the administrative schools and each of the separate
schools and attendance units, by the appropriate divisor from the
tables of support units in this section, then add the quotients
to obtain the district's support units allowance for regular stu-
dents, kindergarten through grade 12 including alternative school


students. Calculations in application of this subsection shall be
carried out to the nearest hundredth.
(ii) Divide the combined totals of the average daily attendance
of all preschool, kindergarten, elementary, secondary, juvenile
detention center students and students with disabilities approved
for inclusion in the exceptional child program of the district by
the appropriate divisor from the table for computation of excep-
tional education support units to obtain the number of support
units allowed for the district's approved exceptional child pro-
gram. Calculations for this subsection shall be carried out to the
nearest hundredth when more than one (1) unit is allowed.
(iii) The total number of support units of the district shall be
the sum of the total support units for regular students, subpara-
graph (i) of this paragraph, and the support units allowance for
the approved exceptional child program, subparagraph (ii) of this
paragraph.
(b) Total District Allowance Educational Program. Multiply the dis-
trict's total number of support units students as determined by the
average daily attendance count, as verified by the state department
of education and the legislative services office, pursuant to section
33-1003A, Idaho Code, carried out to the nearest hundredth, by the state
distribution factor per support unit per-student amount and to this
product add the approved amount of programs of the district provided in
subsection (2) of this section to secure the district's total allowance
for the educational support program.
(c) District Share. The district's share of state apportionment is the
amount of the total district allowance, paragraph (b) of this subsec-
tion.
(d) Adjustment of District Share. The contract salary of every noncer-
tificated teacher shall be subtracted from the district's share as cal-
culated from the provisions of paragraph (c) of this subsection.
(7) (6) Property Tax Computation Ratio. In order to receive state funds
pursuant to this section, a charter district shall utilize a school mainte-
nance and operation property tax computation ratio for the purpose of calcu-
lating its maintenance and operation levy that is no greater than that which
it utilized in tax year 1994, less four-tenths of one percent (.4%). As used
herein, the term "property tax computation ratio" shall mean a ratio deter-
mined by dividing the district's certified property tax maintenance and op-
eration budget by the actual or adjusted market value for assessment pur-
poses as such values existed on December 31, 1993. Such maintenance and op-
eration levy shall be based on the property tax computation ratio multiplied
by the actual or adjusted market value for assessment purposes as such values
existed on December 31 of the prior calendar year.
SECTION 4. That Section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1004B. CAREER LADDER. School districts shall receive an allocation
for instructional staff and pupil service staff based on their staffs' posi-
tion on the career ladder as follows:


(1) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who are in their first
year of holding an Idaho certificate shall be placed in the first cell of the
residency compensation rung and shall move one (1) cell on the residency com-
pensation rung for each year they hold an Idaho certificate and are employed
in an Idaho public school thereafter for up to three (3) years, at which point
they will remain in the third cell of the residency rung until they earn a
professional endorsement.
(2) Instructional staff and pupil service staff in their first year of
holding a professional endorsement shall be placed in the first cell of the
professional compensation rung.
(3) Instructional staff and pupil service staff on the professional
compensation rung with four (4) years of experience shall move one (1) cell
on the professional compensation rung unless they have failed to meet the
professional compensation rung performance criteria for three (3) of the
previous four (4) years. Instructional staff and pupil service staff on the
professional compensation rung who meet the performance criteria for three
(3) of the previous five (5) years, one (1) of which must be during the fourth
or fifth year, shall move one (1) cell. Allocations for instructional staff
and pupil service staff who do not meet the professional compensation rung
performance criteria for three (3) of the previous five (5) years, one (1) of
which must be during the fourth or fifth year, shall remain at the previous
fiscal year allocation level. This also applies to the educational alloca-
tion.
(4) Instructional staff and pupil service staff in their first year of
holding an advanced professional endorsement shall be placed in the first
cell of the advanced professional compensation rung.
(5) Instructional staff and pupil service staff on the advanced profes-
sional compensation rung who met the performance criteria for the advanced
professional rung in the previous year shall move one (1) cell on the ad-
vanced professional compensation rung. Allocations for instructional staff
and pupil service staff who do not meet the advanced professional compensa-
tion rung performance criteria shall remain at the previous fiscal year al-
location level. This also applies to the additional education allocation.
(6) Career technical education instructional staff holding an occupa-
tional specialist certificate shall be placed on the career ladder as fol-
lows:
(a) Instructional staff new to working in an Idaho public school:
(i) With two (2) or three (3) years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been
on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for one (1)
year;
(ii) With four (4) or five (5) years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been
on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for two (2)
years;
(iii) With six (6) or seven (7) years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been


on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for three
(3) years; and
(iv) With eight (8) or more years of industry experience in a
field closely related to the subjects they seek to teach shall be
placed in an equivalent cell to instructional staff who have been
on the career ladder and met the movement requirements for four (4)
years; and
(b) Existing career technical education instructional staff on the
residency compensation rung shall have their placement updated con-
sistent with the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection if the
update would result in a rung higher than their current placement.
(7) Instructional staff or pupil service staff entering their first
year on the career ladder, but with prior certificated instructional, pupil
service, administrative, or equivalent elementary or secondary school ex-
perience, including in an accredited private or parochial school, shall be
placed on the career ladder as follows:
(a) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have been awarded a
professional endorsement shall be placed as follows:
(i) Those with four (4) years of certificated experience and doc-
umentation from the hiring school district or charter school ad-
ministrator, attesting the individual has provided evidence that
the individual has met the professional compensation rung perfor-
mance criteria in two (2) of the previous four (4) years, shall be
placed in an equivalent cell on the career ladder to instructional
staff or pupil service staff who have met the movement criteria for
four (4) years; or
(ii) Those with five (5) or more years of certificated experi-
ence and documentation from the hiring school district or charter
school administrator, attesting the individual has provided ev-
idence that the individual has met the professional compensation
rung performance criteria in three (3) of the previous five (5)
years, with one (1) year being the fourth or fifth year, shall be
placed in an equivalent cell on the career ladder to instructional
staff or pupil service staff who have met the movement criteria for
the equivalent number of years as they have verified experience.
(b) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have been awarded
an advanced professional endorsement with nine (9) or more years of cer-
tificated experience and documentation from the hiring school district
or charter school administrator, attesting the individual has provided
evidence that the individual has met the professional compensation rung
performance criteria in three (3) of the previous five (5) years, with
one (1) year being the fourth or fifth year, shall be placed in an equiv-
alent cell on the career ladder to instructional staff or pupil service
staff who have met the movement criteria for the equivalent number of
years as they have verified experience.
(8) In addition to the allocation amount specified for the applicable
cell on the career ladder, school districts shall receive an additional al-
location amount for career technical education instructional staff holding
an occupational specialist certificate in the area for which they are teach-
ing in the amount of three thousand dollars ($3,000), which shall be des-


ignated for career technical education staff and included as part of their
salary.
(9) In addition to the allocation amount specified for the applicable
cell on the career ladder, school districts shall receive an additional
allocation amount for instructional staff and pupil service staff holding
a professional or an advanced professional endorsement who have acquired
additional education and meet the professional or advanced professional
compensation rung performance criteria. In determining the additional ed-
ucation allocation amount, only transcripted credits and degrees on file
with the teacher certification office of the state department of education,
earned at an institution of higher education accredited by a body recognized
by the state board of education or credits earned through an internship or
work experience approved by the state board of education, shall be allowed.
All credits and degrees earned must be in a relevant pedagogy or content area
as determined by the state department of education. Additional education
allocation amounts are not cumulative. Instructional staff whose initial
certificate is an occupational specialist certificate shall be treated as BA
degree-prepared instructional staff. Credits earned by such occupational
specialist instructional staff after initial certification shall be cred-
ited toward the education allocation. Additional education allocations
are:
(a) For instructional staff and pupil service staff holding a profes-
sional or an advanced professional endorsement, a baccalaureate degree
and twenty-four (24) or more credits, two thousand dollars ($2,000) per
fiscal year.
(b) For instructional staff and pupil service staff holding a profes-
sional or an advanced professional endorsement and a master's degree,
three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) per fiscal year.
(c) Effective July 1, 2021, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $40,369 $40,990 $41,611
Professional $42,991 $44,836 $46,681 $48,526 $50,370
Advanced
Professional $52,734 $53,207
(d) Effective July 1, 2022, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $40,742 $41,486 $42,231
Professional $43,488 $45,302 $47,116 $48,930 $50,743
Advanced
Professional $53,478 $54,442 $55,389
(e) Effective July 1, 2023, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $41,118 $41,988 $42,860


Professional $43,990 $45,773 $47,555 $49,337 $51,119
Advanced
Professional $54,233 $55,705 $57,165 $58,613
(f) Effective July 1, 2024, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $41,500 $42,500 $43,500
Professional $44,500 $46,250 $48,000 $49,750 $51,500
Advanced
Professional $55,000 $57,000 $59,000 $61,000 $63,000
(c) Effective July 1, 2023, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $47,477 $48,347 $49,219
Professional $50,349 $52,132 $53,914 $55,696 $57,478
Advanced
Professional $60,592 $62,064 $63,524 $64,972
(d) Effective July 1, 2024, the allocation shall be:
Base
Allocation 1 2 3 4 5
Residency $47,859 $48,859 $49,859
Professional $50,859 $52,609 $54,359 $56,109 $57,859
Advanced
Professional $61,359 $63,359 $65,359 $67,359 $69,359
(10) Effective July 1, 2025, the educator salary-based apportionment
program compensation rung cell amounts shall be adjusted by an amount equiv-
alent to the salary-based apportionment adjustment for administrative and
classified staff positions.
(11) A review of a sample of evaluations completed by administrators
shall be conducted annually to verify such evaluations are being conducted
with fidelity to the state framework for teaching evaluation, including
each domain and identification of which domain or domains the administrator
is focusing on for the instructional staff or pupil service staff member
being evaluated, as outlined in administrative rule. The review shall be
completed prior to November 1 of each year. The state board of education
shall randomly select a sample of administrators throughout the state. A
portion of such administrators' instructional staff and pupil service staff
employee evaluations shall be independently reviewed. The ratio of in-
structional staff evaluations to pupil service staff evaluations shall be
equal to the ratio of the statewide instructional staff salary allowance to
pupil service staff salary allowance. The state board of education, with
input from the Idaho-approved teacher preparation programs and the state
department of education, shall identify individuals and a process to conduct
the reviews. Administrator certificate holders shall be required to par-
ticipate in ongoing evaluation training pursuant to section 33-1204, Idaho
Code. The state board of education shall report annually the findings of


such reviews to the senate education committee, the house of representatives
education committee, the state board of education and the deans of Idaho's
approved teacher preparation programs. The state board of education shall
promulgate rules implementing the provisions of this subsection.
(12) School districts shall submit annually to the state the data nec-
essary to determine if an instructional staff or pupil service staff member
has met the performance criteria for movement on the applicable compensation
rung. Such data shall include the individuals' performance on each of the
performance criteria as defined in section 33-1001, Idaho Code, including
the percentage of students meeting their measurable student achievement and
student success indicator targets. The department of education shall calcu-
late whether or not instructional staff and pupil service staff have met the
compensation rung performance criteria based on the data submitted during
the previous five (5) years. Individually identifiable performance evalu-
ation ratings submitted to the state remain part of the employee's person-
nel record and are exempt from public disclosure pursuant to section 74-106,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. That Section 33-1009, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1009. PAYMENTS FROM THE PUBLIC SCHOOL INCOME FUND.
1. a. Payments of the state general account appropriation for public
school support shall be made each year by the state department of edu-
cation to the public school districts of the state in four (4) payments.
Payments to the districts shall be made not later than the fifteenth day
of August, the fifteenth day of November, the fifteenth day of February,
and the fifteenth day of May each year. The first payment by the state
department of education shall be approximately fifty percent (50%) of
the total general account appropriation for the fiscal year, while the
second and third payments shall be approximately twenty percent (20%)
each, and the fourth payment approximately ten percent (10%) respec-
tively, except as provided for in section 33-5207, Idaho Code. Amounts
apportioned due to a special transfer to the public school income fund
to restore or reduce a deficiency in the prior year's transfer pursuant
to subsection 4. of this section shall not be subject to this limita-
tion.
b. Payments of moneys, other than the state general account appropria-
tion, that accrue to the public school income fund shall be made by the
state department of education to the school districts of the state on
the fifteenth day of November, February, May and July each year. The
total amount of such payments shall be determined by the state depart-
ment of education and shall not exceed the amount of moneys available
and on deposit in the public school income fund at the time such payment
is made.
c. Amounts apportioned due to a special transfer to the public school
income fund to restore or reduce a deficiency in the prior year's trans-
fer pursuant to subsection 4. of this section shall not be subject to
the limitation imposed by paragraphs a. and b. of this subsection.
2. Payments made to the school districts in August and November are ad-
vance payments for the current year and may be based upon payments from the


public school income fund for the preceding school year. Each school dis-
trict may receive its proportionate share of the advance payments in the same
ratio that its total payment for the preceding year was to the total payments
to all school districts for the preceding year.
3. No later than the fifteenth day of February in each year, the
state department of education shall compute the state distribution factor
per-student funding based on the total average daily attendance through the
first Friday in November. The factor per-student funding will be used in
payments of state funds in February and May. Attendance shall be reported in
a format and at a time specified by the state department of education.
As of the thirtieth day of June of each year the state department of edu-
cation shall determine final payments to be made on July fifteenth next suc-
ceeding to the several school districts from the public school income fund
for the school year ended June 30. The July payments shall take into consid-
eration:
a. The average daily attendance of the several school districts for the
twenty-eight (28) best weeks of the school year completed not later than
the thirtieth of June;
b. All funds available in the public school income fund for the fiscal
year ending on the thirtieth of June;
c. All payments distributed for the current fiscal year to the several
school districts;
d. The adjustment based on the actual amount of discretionary funds
per support unit student required by the provisions of section 33-1018,
Idaho Code;
e. Payments made or due for the transportation support program and the
exceptional education support program. The state department of educa-
tion shall apportion and direct the payment to the several school dis-
tricts the moneys in the public school income fund in each year, taking
into account the advance made under subsection 2. of this section, in
such amounts as will provide in full for each district its support pro-
gram, and not more than therefor required, and no school district shall
receive less than fifty dollars ($50.00).
4. If the full amount appropriated to the public school income fund
from the general account by the legislature is not transferred to the public
school income fund by the end of the fiscal year, the deficiency resulting
therefrom shall either be restored or reduced through a special trans-
fer from the general account in the first sixty (60) days of the following
fiscal year, or shall be calculated in computing district levies, and any
additional levy shall be certified by the state superintendent of public
instruction to the board of county commissioners and added to the district's
maintenance and operation levy. If the deficiency is restored or reduced
by special transfer, the amount so transferred shall be in addition to the
amount appropriated to be transferred in such following fiscal year and
shall be apportioned to each school district in the same amount as each would
have received had the transfer been made in the year the deficiency occurred.
The state department of education shall distribute to the school district
the full amount of the special transfer as soon as practical after such
transfer is made. In making the levy computations required by this subsec-
tion the state department of education shall take into account and consider


the full amount of money receipted into the public school income fund from
all sources for the given fiscal year. Deficits in the transfer of the ap-
propriated amount of general account revenue to the public school income
fund shall be reduced by the amount, if any, that the total amount receipted
from other sources into the public school income fund exceeds the official
estimated amount from those sources. The official estimate of receipts from
other sources shall be the total amount stated by the legislature in the ap-
propriation bill. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any
transfers to or from the public education stabilization fund.
5. Any apportionments in any year, made to any school district, which
may within the succeeding three (3) year period be found to have been in error
either of computation or transmittal, may be corrected during the three (3)
year period by reduction of apportionments to any school district to which
over-apportionments may have been made or received, and corresponding ad-
ditions to apportionments to any school district to which under-apportion-
ments may have been made or received.
SECTION 6. That Section 33-1018, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1018. PUBLIC SCHOOL DISCRETIONARY FUNDING VARIABILITY. (1) The
legislature shall annually state in the appropriation for the educational
support program/division of operations the estimate of the total discre-
tionary the base funding provided per support unit student. The state
department of education shall, before the end of each fiscal year, calculate
the actual discretionary funding available per support unit student.
(1) If the total estimated discretionary funding per support unit
stated in the appropriation for the educational support program/division
of operations is lower than the actual discretionary funding available per
support unit, then the state controller shall multiply the difference by
the number of actual support units, and transfer the result from the public
school income fund to the public education stabilization fund and the final
distributions to school districts from the department of education shall be
reduced by a like amount.
(2) If the total estimated discretionary funding per support unit
stated in the appropriation for the educational support program/division of
operations is greater than the actual discretionary funding available per
support unit, then the state controller shall multiply the difference by the
number of actual support units, and transfer the result from the public edu-
cation stabilization fund to the public school income fund. This transfer
shall be limited to moneys available in the public education stabilization
fund. Moneys transferred from the public education stabilization fund to
the public school income fund under the provisions of this section are hereby
continuously appropriated for the educational support program/division of
operations.
(2) In fiscal year 2026, if the allocation of general discretionary
funds for a school district or public charter school is less than one hundred
percent (100%) of what the allocation would have been if the allocation was
based on support units, then the school district or public charter school
shall be funded based on support units.


SECTION 7. That Section 33-5207, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-5207. PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FINANCIAL SUPPORT. (1) Except as oth-
erwise provided for in this section, the state department of education shall
make the following apportionment to each charter school for each fiscal year
based on attendance figures submitted in a manner and time as required by the
state department of education.
(2) Per student support. Computation of support units for each public
charter school shall be calculated as if it were a separate school according
to the schedules in section 33-1002(4), Idaho Code, except that public char-
ter schools with fewer than one hundred (100) secondary ADA shall use a divi-
sor of twelve (12) and the minimum units shall not apply. No public charter
school shall receive an increase in support units that exceeds the support
units it received in the prior year by more than forty (40), except in cases
of state declared emergencies that have been approved by the authorizer as
having an impact on public education. Funding from the state educational
support program shall be equal to the total distribution factor per-student
funding, plus the salary-based apportionment provided in chapter 10, title
33, Idaho Code. Provided, however, any public charter school that is formed
by the conversion of an existing traditional public school shall be assigned
divisors, pursuant to section 33-1002, Idaho Code, that are no lower than the
divisors of the school district in which the traditional public school is lo-
cated, for each category of pupils listed.
(3) Special education. For each student enrolled in the public char-
ter school who is entitled to special education services, the public charter
school shall receive the state and federal funds from the exceptional child
education program for that student that would have been apportioned to the
school district in which the public charter school is located.
(4) Alternative school support. Public charter schools may qualify
under the provisions of sections 33-1002 and 33-1002C, Idaho Code, provided
the public charter school meets the necessary statutory requirements and
students qualify for attendance at an alternative school as provided by rule
of the state board of education.
(5) Transportation support. Support shall be paid to the public char-
ter school as provided in chapter 15, title 33, Idaho Code, and section
33-1006, Idaho Code. Each public charter school shall furnish the depart-
ment with an enrollment count as of the first Friday in November of public
charter school students who are eligible for reimbursement of transporta-
tion costs under the provisions of this subsection and who reside more than
one and one-half (1 1/2) miles from the school. The state department of edu-
cation is authorized to include in the annual appropriation to the charter
school sixty percent (60%) of the estimated transportation cost. The final
appropriation payment in July shall reflect reimbursements of actual costs
pursuant to section 33-1006, Idaho Code. To be eligible for state reimburse-
ment under the provisions of section 33-1006, Idaho Code, the student to be
transported must reside within the public charter school's primary atten-
dance area and must meet at least one (1) of the following criteria:
(a) The student resides within the school district in which the public
charter school is physically located; or


(b) The student resides within fifteen (15) miles by road of the public
charter school. The limitations placed by this subsection on the reim-
bursement of transportation costs for certain students shall not apply
to public virtual schools.
(6) Facilities funds.
(a) The state department of education shall distribute facilities
funds to public charter schools for each student in which a majority
of the student's instruction is received at a physical facility that
is owned or leased by the public charter school. Such funds shall be
used to defray the costs associated with payments for real property used
by the students or employees of the public charter school for educa-
tional or administrative purposes. Such funds shall be distributed at
four hundred dollars ($400) per attending student pursuant to section
33-1003A, Idaho Code. For the purposes of this paragraph, beginning in
state fiscal year 2025, "attending student" means each student in aver-
age daily attendance in kindergarten through grade 12 at such physical
charter school facilities where the student is enrolled; except that,
upon formal approval by the state board of education, a charter school
may receive an exemption to the physical facility requirement pursuant
to the provisions of this paragraph if the student would have attended a
physical facility if not for a stated emergency.
(b) For those public charter schools that do not receive facilities
funds for all enrolled students, the school may submit to the state
department of education a reimbursement claim for any costs for which
facilities funds may be used. The state department of education shall
reduce such claim by the greater of fifty percent (50%) or the percent-
age of the school's enrolled students for which the school receives
facilities funds and shall pay the balance. Provided, however, that the
total reimbursements paid to a public charter school, in combination
with any facilities stipend received by the school, shall not exceed the
amount of facilities funds that would have been received by the school
had the school received facilities funds for all students in average
daily attendance pursuant to section 33-1003A, Idaho Code. For the
purposes of this subsection, the term "real property" shall be used as
defined in section 63-201, Idaho Code. A virtual public charter school
authorized by the public charter school commission or authorized by a
public school district on or after March 1, 2024, shall not be eligible
for funds appropriated pursuant to the provisions of this subsection.
(7) Payment schedule. The state department of education is authorized
to make an advance payment of twenty-five percent (25%) of a public charter
school's estimated annual apportionment for its first year of operation,
and each year thereafter, provided the public charter school is serving more
grades or at least ten percent (10%) more classes than the previous year, to
assist the school with initial start-up costs or payroll obligations. For
a public charter school entering at least its second year of operation, the
state department of education may require documentation establishing the
need for such an advance payment, including comparative class schedules and
proof of a commensurate increase in the number of employees.


(a) For a public charter school to receive the advance payment, the
school shall submit its anticipated fall membership for each grade
level to the state department of education by June 1.
(b) Using the figures provided by the public charter school, the state
department of education shall determine an estimated annual apportion-
ment from which the amount of the advance payment shall be calculated.
Advance payment shall be made to the school on or after July 1 but no
later than July 31.
(c) All subsequent payments, taking into account the onetime advance
payment made for the first year of operation, shall be made to the public
charter school in the same manner as other traditional public schools in
accordance with the provisions of section 33-1009, Idaho Code. A public
charter school shall comply with all applicable fiscal requirements of
law, except that the following provisions shall not be applicable to
public charter schools: that portion of section 33-1004, Idaho Code,
relating to reduction of the administrative and instructional staff
allowance and the pupil service staff allowance when there is a dis-
crepancy between the number allowed and the number actually employed;
and section 33-1004E, Idaho Code, for calculation of district staff
indices.
(8) If an authorizer has reason to believe that a public charter school
cannot remain fiscally sound for the remainder of its certificate term, it
shall provide the state department of education with written notification of
such concern. Upon receiving such notification, the state department of ed-
ucation shall have the authority to modify the percentage of the total appro-
priation to be paid to the public charter school pursuant to the provisions
of section 33-1009 1., Idaho Code, such that equal percentages are paid on
each of the prescribed dates.
(9) Each public charter school shall pay an authorizer fee to its au-
thorizer, not to initially exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or, in
the case of existing charter schools, up to a five-percent (5%) increase of
the previous year's fee. Authorizers shall annually set the authorizer's
fee and in doing so shall document the fees to actual expenditures associated
with authorizing.
(10) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a public charter school from:
(a) Applying for federal grant moneys or for career technical education
funding of any source; or
(b) Receiving funding or other financial assistance for the establish-
ment or operation of a public charter school from any private person or
organization.
(11) Each student in attendance at a public virtual school shall be
funded based on either the actual hours of attendance in the public virtual
school on a flexible schedule or the percentage of coursework completed,
whichever is more advantageous to the school, up to the maximum of one (1)
full-time equivalent student.
(12) All federal educational funds shall be administered and dis-
tributed to public charter schools, including public virtual schools, that
have been designated as a local education agency (LEA), as provided in sec-
tion 33-5203, Idaho Code.


(13) Nothing in this section prohibits separate face-to-face learning
activities or services. In order to be eligible for career technical educa-
tion essential components funding, virtual schools may be required to offer
some face-to-face instruction in order to meet industry standards, licens-
ing requirements, work-based learning requirements, or other requirements
set forth by law.
(14) The provisions of section 33-1021, Idaho Code, shall apply to pub-
lic charter schools provided for in this chapter.
SECTION 8. That Section 33-512D, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-512D. SELF-DIRECTED LEARNER DESIGNATION. (1) A student attending
public school in Idaho shall be eligible to be designated as a self-directed
learner. For the purposes of this section, a "self-directed learner" means a
full-time student:
(a) Who demonstrates mastery of content knowledge through grades, as-
sessments, or mastery-based learning rubrics;
(b) Whose teacher or teachers designate the student as such. The
teacher may consider the student's mastery of the content, academic
growth, timeliness for assignments, self-motivation, ability to estab-
lish goals, and reaching age-appropriate learning outcomes;
(c) Who, starting in grade 5, demonstrates mastery of addition and mul-
tiplication for numbers 0-10, as well as related subtraction and divi-
sion problems, known collectively as "math facts"; and
(d) Who, starting in grade 8, demonstrates an informed choice of post-
secondary career and education goals by:
(i) Completing and updating his student learning plan as defined
in section 33-1001(30) 33-1001(31), Idaho Code;
(ii) Supplementing his student learning plan, as applicable, with
the following that further his postsecondary goals:
1. Extended learning opportunities as defined in section
33-6401, Idaho Code;
2. Courses and examinations funded in chapter 46, title 33,
Idaho Code; or
3. Any other credits or programs permitted under Idaho Code
or district policy as applicable to the student's learning
plan; and
(iii) Identifying and writing down self-determined personal life
goals, including an explanation of how attending specific classes
will lead to the fulfillment of personal life goals.
(2) Each school district or public charter school may adopt a self-di-
rected learner policy to provide processes:
(a) Through which students may seek a self-directed learner designa-
tion;
(b) By which teachers may designate a student as a self-directed
learner;
(c) To monitor and support self-directed learners;
(d) By which a student's teacher or teachers rescind the self-directed
learner designation; and
(e) As otherwise necessary for implementation.


(3) Once a student is designated a self-directed learner, the student
has the right to flexible learning. Flexible learning may be different for
each student and may include flexible attendance, attending school virtu-
ally, extended learning opportunities, and any other agreed-upon learning
inside or outside the classroom. Starting in grade 8, flexible learning
should further the student's progress toward postsecondary goals. Any flex-
ible learning permitted under this section must be agreed upon by the stu-
dent, his teacher or teachers, and the student's parents or legal guardian.
(4) In order to remain a self-directed learner, the student must meet
criteria agreed upon by him, his teacher or teachers, and his parents or le-
gal guardian. Criteria may include continued mastery of content knowledge
and skills, academic growth, progress toward postsecondary goals, or other
measures of student learning. If a student fails to meet the agreed-upon
criteria or fails to stay current on classroom assignments, and does not cure
the failure within an agreed-upon time frame, the building administrator
shall rescind the self-directed learner designation upon recommendation by
the teacher or teachers.
(5) A self-directed learner will be reported as enrolled as one (1.0)
FTE or in attendance for a full day in school for the purpose of calculat-
ing support units and public school funding. The district or charter school
will receive full funding for its self-directed learners, regardless of at-
tendance or actual hours of instruction up to one (1) full day of attendance
or one (1.0) FTE, or the remaining day or FTE if the student is shared between
two (2) or more school districts or public charter schools.
(6) Each school district or public charter school must report the num-
ber of self-directed learners to the state department of education annually.
SECTION 9. That Section 33-515, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-515. ISSUANCE OF RENEWABLE CONTRACTS. (1) During the third full
year of continuous employment by the same school district, including
any specially chartered district, each certificated employee named in
subsection (34) of section 33-1001 section 33-1001(35), Idaho Code, and each
school nurse and school librarian who has obtained a professional endorse-
ment under section 33-1201A, Idaho Code, shall be evaluated for a renewable
contract and shall, upon having been offered a contract for the next ensuing
year, and upon signing and timely returning a contract for a fourth full
year, be placed on a renewable contract status with said school district
entitling such individual to the right to automatic renewal of contract,
subject to the provisions included in this chapter, provided that instruc-
tional staff who have not obtained a professional endorsement under section
33-1201A, Idaho Code, may not be placed on a renewable contract status,
provided however, if the career ladder pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho
Code, is not funded, then a professional endorsement shall not be required.
Additionally, any individual who has not successfully completed the three
(3) year nontraditional route program while on a three (3) year interim cer-
tificate and has not yet been issued a five (5) year renewable certificate
may not be placed on a renewable contract. Such individual will remain on
a category 3 contract, even after serving three (3) continuous years of em-
ployment with the same school district.


(2) At least once annually, the performance of each renewable contract
certificated employee, school nurse, or school librarian shall be evaluated
according to criteria and procedures established by the board of trustees in
accordance with general guidelines approved by the state board of education.
Such an evaluation shall be completed no later than June 1 of each year. The
evaluation shall include a minimum of two (2) documented observations, one
(1) of which shall be completed prior to January 1 of each year.
(3) Any contract automatically renewed under the provisions of this
section may be renewed for a shorter term, longer term or the same length
of term as stated in the current contract and at a greater, lesser or equal
salary as that stated in the current contract. Absent the board's applica-
tion of a formal reduction in force, renewals of standard teacher contracts
may be for a shorter term, longer term or the same length of term as stated
in the current standard teacher contract and at a greater, lesser or equal
salary, and shall be uniformly applied to all employees based upon the dis-
trict's adopted salary schedule to the extent allowable in section 33-1004E,
Idaho Code.
(a) Contracts issued pursuant to this section shall be issued on or be-
fore the first day of July each year.
(b) At the discretion of the board, the district may issue letters of
intent for employment for the next ensuing school year to renewable
contract status employees during May of each school year. Such let-
ter of intent shall not state a specific duration of the contract or
salary/benefits term for the next ensuing school year.
(c) Unless otherwise negotiated and ratified by both parties pursuant
to section 33-1271 et seq., Idaho Code, standard teacher renewals for
terms shorter in length than that stated in the current standard con-
tract of renewable certificated employees, should be considered and im-
plemented only after the district has determined that the salary-based
apportionment reimbursement that it estimates it will receive for the
ensuing school year is less than the sum the district would otherwise be
paying for salaries for certificated professional employees.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prevent the board of trustees from of-
fering a renewed contract increasing the salary of any certificated person,
or from reassigning an administrative employee to a nonadministrative posi-
tion with appropriate reduction of salary from the preexisting salary level.
In the event the board of trustees reassigns an administrative employee to a
nonadministrative position, the board shall give written notice to the em-
ployee that contains a statement of the reasons for the reassignment. The
employee, upon written request to the board, shall be entitled to an informal
review of that decision. The process and procedure for the informal review
shall be determined by the local board of trustees.
(5) Before a board of trustees can determine not to renew for reasons of
an unsatisfactory report of the performance of any certificated person whose
contract would otherwise be automatically renewed, such person shall be en-
titled to a reasonable period of probation. This period of probation shall
be preceded by a written notice from the board of trustees with reasons for
such probationary period and with provisions for adequate supervision and
evaluation of the person's performance during the probationary period. Such
period of probation shall not affect the person's renewable contract status.


Consideration of probationary status for certificated personnel is consid-
eration of the status of an employee within the meaning of section 74-206,
Idaho Code, and may be held in executive session. If the consideration re-
sults in probationary status, the individual on probation shall not be named
in the minutes of the meeting. A record of the decision shall be placed in the
teacher's personnel file.
(6) If the board of trustees takes action to immediately discharge
or discharge upon termination of the current contract a certificated per-
son whose contract would otherwise be automatically renewed, the action
of the board shall be consistent with the procedures specified in section
33-513(5), Idaho Code, and, furthermore, the board shall notify the employee
in writing whether there is just and reasonable cause not to renew the con-
tract or to reduce the salary of the affected employee, and, if so, what
reasons it relied upon in that determination.
(7) If the board of trustees takes action after the declaration of a fi-
nancial emergency pursuant to section 33-522, Idaho Code, and such action is
directed at more than one (1) certificated employee, and if mutually agreed
to by both parties, a single informal review shall be conducted. Without
mutual consent of both parties, the board of trustees shall use the follow-
ing procedure to conduct a single due process hearing within sixty-seven
(67) days of the declaration of financial emergency pursuant to section
33-522(2), Idaho Code, or on or before June 22, whichever shall occur first:
(a) The superintendent or any other duly authorized administrative of-
ficer of the school district may recommend the change in the length of
the term stated in the current contract or reduce the salary of any cer-
tificated employee by filing with the board of trustees written notice
specifying the purported reasons for such changes.
(b) Upon receipt of such notice, the board of trustees, acting through
its duly authorized administrative official, shall give the affected
employees written notice of the reductions and the recommendation of
the change in the length of the term stated in the current contract or
the reduction of salary, along with written notice of a hearing be-
fore the board of trustees prior to any determination by the board of
trustees.
(c) The hearing shall be scheduled to take place not less than six (6)
days nor more than fourteen (14) days after receipt of the notice by the
employees. The date provided for the hearing may be changed by mutual
consent.
(d) The hearing shall be open to the public.
(e) All testimony at the hearing shall be given under oath or affirma-
tion. Any member of the board, or the clerk of the board of trustees, may
administer oaths to witnesses or affirmations by witnesses.
(f) The employees may be represented by legal counsel and/or by a repre-
sentative of a local or state education association.
(g) The chairman of the board of trustees or the designee of the chair-
man shall conduct the hearing.
(h) The board of trustees shall cause an electronic record of the hear-
ing to be made or shall employ a competent reporter to take stenographic
or stenotype notes of all the testimony at the hearing. A transcript of


the hearing shall be provided at cost by the board of trustees upon re-
quest of the employee.
(i) At the hearing, the superintendent or other duly authorized admin-
istrative officer shall present evidence to substantiate the reduction
contained in such notice.
(j) The employees may produce evidence to refute the reduction. Any
witness presented by the superintendent or by the employees shall be
subject to cross-examination. The board of trustees may also examine
witnesses and be represented by counsel.
(k) The affected employees may file written briefs and arguments with
the board of trustees within three (3) days after the close of the hear-
ing or such other time as may be agreed upon by the affected employees
and the board of trustees.
(l) Within seven (7) days following the close of the hearing, the board
of trustees shall determine and, acting through its duly authorized ad-
ministrative official, shall notify the employees in writing whether
the evidence presented at the hearing established the need for the ac-
tion taken.
The due process hearing pursuant to this subsection shall not be required if
the board of trustees and the local education association reach an agreement
on issues agreed upon pursuant to section 33-522(3), Idaho Code.
(8) If the board of trustees, for reasons other than unsatisfactory
service, for the ensuing contract year, determines to change the length of
the term stated in the current contract, reduce the salary or not renew the
contract of a certificated person whose contract would otherwise be automat-
ically renewed, nothing herein shall require a probationary period.
(9) If the board of trustees, for reasons other than unsatisfactory
service, for the ensuing contract year, determines to change the length
of the term stated in the current contract or reduce the salary of a cer-
tificated person whose contract would otherwise be automatically renewed,
nothing herein shall require any individualized due process proceeding. In
such circumstance, the board shall hold a single informal review for all im-
pacted employees. The process and procedure for the single informal review
shall be determined by the local board of trustees.
SECTION 10. That Section 33-911, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-911. SCHOOL DISTRICT FACILITIES FUND. (1) There is hereby cre-
ated in the state treasury the school district facilities fund. The fund
shall consist of moneys provided pursuant to sections 57-811, 63-3638, and
67-7434, Idaho Code, and any legislative transfers or appropriations. In-
terest earned from the investment of moneys in the fund shall be returned to
the fund.
(2) The moneys in the fund shall be distributed by the state controller
to the state department of education by August 1 each year for the purpose
of construction or renovation of school facilities. The moneys shall be
distributed by the state department of education to each school district, as
defined in section 33-1001(21) 33-1001(22), Idaho Code, first as provided
in subsection (7) of this section and then on a per-pupil basis using the
average daily attendance calculation provided in section 33-1003A, Idaho


Code, for each student in kindergarten through grade 12 at physical facil-
ities that are part of and on school grounds of the school district in which
the student is enrolled with verification, as needed, by the office of the
state board of education. Upon formal approval by the state board of edu-
cation, a school district may receive an exemption to the physical facility
requirement pursuant to this subsection if the student would have attended
a physical facility in the school district if not for a stated emergency.
The state department of education shall transfer the moneys by no later than
August 31 each year to each school district. Such moneys shall be used in
place of property tax levy moneys and shall be expended by a school district
for one (1) or more of the purposes set forth in paragraphs (a) through (d) of
this subsection. Moneys in the fund must be used by a school district in the
following order of priority:
(a) Payment of existing school bonds authorized pursuant to chapter 11,
title 33, Idaho Code;
(b) Payment of supplemental school levies authorized pursuant to sec-
tion 33-802, Idaho Code, excluding indefinite term supplemental levies
described in section 33-802(5), Idaho Code;
(c) Payment of school plant facility levies authorized pursuant to sec-
tions 33-804 and 33-804A, Idaho Code; and
(d) Any moneys that remain following the payments provided in para-
graphs (a) through (c) of this subsection may be: used for construction
of a new school facility, renovation, or maintenance needs; used to
secure and make payments on a new school facilities bond; or saved in
a reserve account by the school district for future school facility
needs. Uses of funds shall include regular and routine facilities
maintenance, including preventive maintenance, building repairs, and
building security, and periodic major facilities projects that involve
planning, design, construction, renovation, retrofitting, and replac-
ing of buildings and building systems, components, and features, as
well as site acquisition, site improvements, and new construction.
(3) The amount of moneys received by a school district pursuant to this
section must be deducted from a school levy that would otherwise have been
paid by property taxpayers. Such moneys may not be duplicated by the collec-
tion of property tax, and no property taxes may be collected in order to make
extra payments on expenses described in subsection (2) of this section in ex-
cess of required amounts.
(4) Each school district shall identify the amount received in the cur-
rent year pursuant to this section in the certification of its budget in ac-
cordance with section 63-803, Idaho Code. Said amount must be subtracted
from the amount to be levied. The amount of moneys thereby saved from being
collected by a property tax levy shall be reported on each property tax no-
tice pursuant to section 63-902, Idaho Code.
(5) Each school district shall report annually to the state department
of education, in a manner prescribed by it, on the expenditure of moneys it
has received pursuant to this section. The state department of education
shall present the reports to the legislature each January.
(6) For the purposes of this section, the Idaho school for the deaf and
the blind shall be considered a school district and shall receive a distribu-
tion based on the average daily attendance of the school.


(7)(a) For state fiscal year 2025 only, any school district that would
have received support from the bond levy equalization support program
for a qualified bond passed prior to January 1, 2024, and for which prop-
erty taxes were levied in property tax year 2023 pursuant to the amount
intended by the bond shall receive a distribution of funds from the dis-
tribution provided under subsection (2) of this section of at least as
much as would have been provided through bond levy equalization support
on July 1, 2024.
(b) For state fiscal year 2026 only, any school district that would have
received support from the bond levy equalization support program for a
qualified bond passed prior to January 1, 2024, and for which property
taxes were levied in property tax year 2024 pursuant to the amount in-
tended by the bond shall receive a distribution of funds from the dis-
tribution provided under subsection (2) of this section of at least as
much as would have been provided through bond levy equalization support
on July 1, 2025.
(c) The state department of education may adjust distributions for re-
maining districts proportionally as necessary pursuant to this para-
graph. On and after July 1, 2024, school districts may use funds pro-
vided in this section and section 33-913, Idaho Code, to offset the bond
levy equalization support.
SECTION 11. That Section 33-915, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-915. FIXED DISTRIBUTION -- SCHOOL MODERNIZATION FACILITIES
FUND. (1) The state department of education shall establish a fixed distri-
bution of funds to be made available for voluntary election to each school
district subject to the conditions in this section.
(a) The distribution shall be calculated in state fiscal year 2025 for
each school district, as defined in section 33-1001(21) 33-1001(22),
Idaho Code, that is in operation as of July 1, 2024.
(b) The distribution shall be calculated by multiplying the following
two (2) factors, both of which shall be based on the most recent data
available in the state fiscal year coinciding with the distribution
calculation:
(i) Calculate the per-pupil amount, using the average daily at-
tendance calculation provided in section 33-1003A, Idaho Code,
for each student in kindergarten through grade 12 at physical
facilities that are part of and on school grounds of the school
district in which the student is enrolled with verification, as
needed, by the office of the state board of education. Upon formal
approval by the state board of education, a school district may re-
ceive an exemption to the physical facility requirement pursuant
to this subsection if the student would have attended a physical
facility in the school district if not for a stated emergency; and
(ii) Calculate, together with the Idaho state building authority,
the total amount that a bond issuance would generate, based on the
amount established in section 63-3638(19), Idaho Code.


(c) In no case shall the amount awarded to any school district be less
than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) over the ten (10) year pe-
riod.
(d) In no case shall the amount awarded to any school district with an
active charter district maintenance and operation levy pursuant to sec-
tion 33-802(6), Idaho Code, or a charter district supplemental mainte-
nance and operation levy pursuant to section 33-802(4), Idaho Code, ex-
ceed forty million dollars ($40,000,000) over the ten (10) year period.
Excess funds shall be distributed proportionately according to the
factors established in paragraph (b) of this subsection to remaining
school districts that received initial allocations below forty million
dollars ($40,000,000). Any districts receiving reallocations under
this paragraph shall not exceed forty million dollars ($40,000,000).
(e) For the purposes of this section, the Idaho school for the deaf and
the blind shall be considered a school district and shall receive a dis-
tribution based on the average daily attendance of the school.
(2) The provisions of this section shall be null, void, and of no force
and effect on and after June 30, 2034.
SECTION 12. That Section 33-1004, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1004. STAFF ALLOWANCE. For each school district, a staff allowance
shall be determined as follows:
(1) Using the daily attendance reports that have been submitted for
computing the February 15 apportionment of state funds as provided in sec-
tion 33-1009, Idaho Code, calculate the total support units for the district
in the manner provided in section 33-1002(6)(a)(5)(a), Idaho Code. If the
support units used to calculate discretionary funding pursuant to sections
33-1009 and 33-1018, Idaho Code, are at least three percent (3%) greater,
seventy-five percent (75%) of the difference shall be added to the support
units used for the February 15 apportionment of state funds;
(2) Determine the instructional staff allowance by multiplying the
support units by 1.021. A district must demonstrate that it actually employs
the number of certificated instructional staff allowed, except as provided
in subsection (6)(f) and (g) of this section. If the district does not employ
the number allowed, the staff allowance shall be reduced to the actual number
employed, except as provided in subsection (6)(f) and (g) of this section;
(3) Determine the pupil service staff allowance by multiplying the sup-
port units by 0.079;
(4) Determine the administrative staff allowance by multiplying the
support units by .075;
(5) Determine the classified staff allowance by multiplying the sup-
port units by .375;
(6) Additional conditions governing staff allowance:
(a) In determining the number of staff in subsections (2), (3), (4) and
(5) of this section, a district may contract separately for services to
be rendered by nondistrict employees and such employees may be counted
in the staff allowance. A "nondistrict employee" means a person for
whom the school district does not pay the employer's obligations for
employee benefits. When a district contracts for the services of a


nondistrict employee, only the salary portion of the contract shall be
allowable for computations.
(b) If there are circumstances preventing eligible use of staff al-
lowance to which a district is entitled as provided in subsections (2),
(3) and (4) of this section, an appeal may be filed with the state de-
partment of education outlining the reasons and proposed alternative
use of these funds, and a waiver may be granted.
(c) For any district with less than forty (40) support units:
(i) The instructional staff allowance shall be calculated
applying the actual number of support units. If the actual in-
structional staff employed in the school year is greater than the
instructional staff allowance, then the instructional staff al-
lowance shall be increased by one-half (1/2) staff allowance; and
(ii) The administrative staff allowance shall be calculated ap-
plying the actual number of support units. If the actual adminis-
trative staff employed in the school year is greater than the ad-
ministrative staff allowance, then the administrative staff al-
lowance shall be increased by one-half (1/2) staff allowance.
(iii) Additionally, for any district with less than twenty (20)
support units, the instructional staff allowance shall be calcu-
lated applying the actual number of support units. If the number
of instructional staff employed in the school year is greater than
the instructional staff allowance, the staff allowance shall be
increased as provided in subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this para-
graph, and by an additional one-half (1/2) instructional staff al-
lowance.
(d) For any school district with one (1) or more separate secondary
schools serving grades 9 through 12, the instructional staff allowance
shall be increased by two (2) additional instructional staff allowances
for each such separate secondary school.
(e) Only instructional, pupil service and administrative staff and
classified personnel compensated by the school district from the gen-
eral maintenance and operation fund of the district shall be included in
the calculation of staff allowance or in any other calculations based
upon staff, including determination of the experience and education
multiplier, the reporting requirements, or the district's salary-based
apportionment calculation. No food service staff or transportation
staff shall be included in the staff allowance.
(f) A district may utilize up to fifteen percent (15%) of the moneys
associated with positions funded pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section to pay another school district or public charter school for
instructional services or to defray the cost of providing virtual edu-
cation coursework, including virtual dual credit coursework, without a
reduction in the number of funded positions being imposed.
(g) A district may employ nine and one-half percent (9.5%) fewer posi-
tions than funded pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section,
without a reduction in the number of funded positions being imposed.
Beginning in fiscal year 2016, this figure shall be reduced by one per-
cent (1%) each year for each school district in which the average class
size, as determined from prior fiscal year data reported to the state


department of education, was at least one (1) student greater than the
statewide average class size. The state department of education shall
report to the legislature every February, beginning in 2015, on the re-
ductions scheduled to take place in this figure, by school district, in
the ensuing fiscal year.
(i) In the determination of statewide average class size, the
state department of education shall not use a single figure de-
veloped through the averaging of all districts of varying size,
geographical location and pupil populations throughout the state.
The statewide average class size shall be comprised of multiple
figures determined through analysis of like and similarly sit-
uated districts and use of the divisor breakdown established in
section 33-1002, Idaho Code.
(ii) The state board of education may promulgate rules outlining
the method of calculation of the statewide average class size fig-
ures.
(iii) The one percent (1%) reduction required in paragraph (g) of
this subsection shall not be applicable for any school year subse-
quent to a year when the school district's boundaries have changed
because of division, consolidation, excision or annexation of
territory.
(7) In the event that the staff allowance in any category is insuffi-
cient to meet accreditation standards, a district may appeal to the state
board of education, demonstrating the insufficiency, and the state board may
grant a waiver authorizing sufficient additional staff to be included within
the staff allowance to meet accreditation standards. Such a waiver shall be
limited to one (1) year, but may be renewed upon showing of continuing justi-
fication.
(8) A district may utilize a portion of the instructional staff al-
lowance provided for in this section for kindergarten teachers to visit the
parents or guardians of students during the first week of the kindergarten
school year. Such visits may take place at school, at the student's home
or at another location agreed to by the teacher and parents or guardians.
The purpose of such visits is to help strengthen the working relationship
between the teacher, the parents or guardians, and the student. The visits
should be used as an opportunity to help establish the teacher's expecta-
tions of the student. The visit should also provide an opportunity for the
parents or guardians to explain their expectations. The amount of moneys to
be expended for such visits by the district may not exceed the amount equal
to one (1) week of instructional staff allowance computed for kindergarten
instructors in the district.
SECTION 13. That Section 33-1201A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended to read as follows:
33-1201A. IDAHO PROFESSIONAL ENDORSEMENT -- ELIGIBILITY. (1) Any in-
structional staff employee or any pupil service staff employee will receive
mentoring as outlined in such employee's individualized professional learn-
ing plan during the initial three (3) years of holding such certificate.
Upon holding a certificate for three (3) years, any such instructional staff
or pupil service staff employee may apply for an Idaho professional endorse-


ment. Upon holding a professional endorsement for five (5) years or more,
any such instructional staff or pupil service staff employee may apply for an
Idaho advanced professional endorsement. Individuals who hold an instruc-
tional staff certificate and a pupil service staff certificate shall have
their experience based on the overall years of experience if held consecu-
tively or the certificate they have held the longest if dually certificated.
(2) To be eligible for an Idaho professional endorsement, the instruc-
tional staff or pupil service staff employee must:
(a) Have held a certificate and been employed in a public school for at
least three (3) years or have completed a state board of education-ap-
proved interim certificate of three (3) years or longer;
(b) Show they met the professional compensation rung performance cri-
teria for two (2) of the three (3) previous years or the third year;
(c) Have a written recommendation from the employing school district;
and
(d) Have an annual individualized professional learning plan developed
in conjunction with the employee's school district supervisor.
Instructional staff employees may provide additional evidence demonstrat-
ing effective teaching that may be considered in exceptional cases for
purposes of determining proficiency and student achievement in the event
required standards for professional endorsement are not met. Pupil service
staff employees may provide additional evidence demonstrating effective
student achievement or success that may be considered in exceptional cases
for purposes of determining proficiency and student achievement or success
in the event required standards for professional endorsement are not met.
(3) To be eligible for an Idaho advanced professional endorsement, the
instructional staff or pupil service staff employee must:
(a) Have held a renewable certificate and been employed in a public
school for at least eight (8) years or more or have completed a state
board of education-approved interim certificate of three (3) years or
longer and held a renewable certificate and been employed in a public
school for five (5) years or more;
(b) Show they met the professional compensation rung performance cri-
teria for four (4) of the five (5) previous years or the third, fourth,
and fifth year;
(c) During three (3) of the previous five (5) years, have served in
an additional building or district leadership role in an Idaho public
school, including but not limited to:
(i) Instructional specialist or instructional coach;
(ii) Mentor;
(iii) Curriculum or assessment committee member;
(iv) Team or committee leadership position;
(v) Data coach; or
(vi) Other leadership positions identified by the school dis-
trict;
(d) Have a written recommendation from the employing school district;
(e) Have an annual individualized professional learning plan developed
in conjunction with the employee's supervisor and a self-evaluation;
and


(f)(i) Effective July 1, 2020, through June 30, 2021, show they
have met the advanced professional compensation rung performance
criteria for three (3) of the five (5) previous years or the fifth
year;
(ii) Effective July 1, 2021, through June 30, 2022, show they have
met the advanced professional compensation rung performance cri-
teria for three (3) of the five (5) previous years or the fourth and
fifth year; or
(iii) Effective July 1, 2022, show they have met the advanced pro-
fessional compensation rung performance criteria for three (3) of
the five (5) previous years.
Instructional staff employees may provide additional evidence demon-
strating effective teaching that may be considered in exceptional cases
for purposes of determining proficiency and student achievement in the
event required standards for the advanced professional endorsement are not
met. Pupil service staff employees may provide additional evidence demon-
strating effective student achievement or success that may be considered
in exceptional cases for purposes of determining proficiency and student
achievement or success in the event required standards for the advanced pro-
fessional endorsement are not met.
(4) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have been certified
in another state shall be eligible for the professional endorsement if they:
(a) Have a written recommendation from the employing school district;
(b) Have worked in a certificated position in a compact-member state
other than Idaho pursuant to section 33-4104, Idaho Code; and
(c) Would have been eligible to work in a certificated position in an
Idaho public school based on that certification for three (3) to eight
(8) years.
(5) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have been certified
in another state shall be eligible for the advanced professional endorsement
if they:
(a) Have a written recommendation from the employing school district;
(b) Have worked in a certificated position in a compact-member state
other than Idaho pursuant to section 33-4104, Idaho Code; and
(c) Would have been eligible to work in a certificated position in an
Idaho public school based on that certification for nine (9) years or
more.
(6) Instructional staff and pupil service staff who have worked in
an accredited private school and maintained their instructional or pupil
service staff certification may use their years of private school work ex-
perience to meet the years of experience requirements for the professional
and advanced professional endorsement. Such staff may provide additional
evidence demonstrating effective teaching that may be considered in excep-
tional cases for purposes of determining proficiency and student achieve-
ment requirements for professional and advanced professional eligibility
criteria.
(7) Individuals holding a professional endorsement or an advanced pro-
fessional endorsement will be annually evaluated in at least two (2) domains
in the state evaluation framework approved by the state board of education.
All other instructional or pupil service staff employees must be evaluated


across all domains in the evaluation framework. Ratings in the domains de-
scribed in section 33-1001(20)(b) 33-1001(21)(b), Idaho Code, are required
as part of the advanced professional compensation rung performance crite-
ria.
(8) The state board of education shall promulgate rules implementing
the provisions of this section.
(9) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Certificate" means an Idaho instructional certificate, pupil
service staff certificate, or out-of-state educator certificate that
meets the requirements for reciprocity under rules promulgated by the
state board of education;
(b) In conjunction with the Idaho evaluation framework, "individual-
ized professional learning plan" means an individualized professional
development plan based on the Idaho framework for teaching evaluation
and includes, at a minimum, identified interventions based on the indi-
vidual's strengths and areas of needed growth, how the individual will
set student achievement and growth goals, and areas of identified pro-
fessional development and mentoring that target continuous improvement
in professional areas, future student achievement, and school building
or district culture;
(c) "Instructional staff" means those involved in the direct instruc-
tion of a student or group of students and who hold a certificate issued
under section 33-1201, Idaho Code;
(d) "Pupil service staff" means those who provide services to students
but are not involved in direct instruction of those students and who
hold a certificate issued under section 33-1201, Idaho Code; and
(e) "School district" means a school district or a public charter
school.
SECTION 14. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.